California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Every person who feloniously steals, takes, or carries away a companion animal of another which is of a value not exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) is guilty of petty theft.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “companion animal” means an animal, including, but not limited to, a dog or a cat that a person keeps and provides care for as a household
 pet or otherwise for the purpose of companionship, emotional support, service, or protection.

(2) For purposes of this section, “companion animal” excludes feral animals, including, but not limited to, feral cats as defined in Section 31752.5 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 546, Sec. 2.   (AB 1290)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

487g.

Every person who steals or maliciously takes or carries away any animal of another for purposes of sale, medical research, slaughter, or other commercial use, or who knowingly, by any false representation or pretense, defrauds another person of any animal for purposes of sale, medical research, slaughter, or other commercial use is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or in the state prison.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 151, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

487h.

(a) Every person who steals, takes, or carries away cargo of another, if the cargo taken is of a
 value exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), except as provided in Sections 487, 487a, and 487d, is guilty of grand theft.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “cargo” means any goods, wares, products, or manufactured merchandise that has been loaded into a trailer, railcar, or cargo container, awaiting or in transit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 607, Sec. 1.   (SB 24)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

487i.

Any person who defrauds a housing program of a public housing authority of more than four hundred dollars ($400) is guilty of grand theft.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

487j.

Every person who steals, takes, or carries away copper materials of another, including, but not limited to, copper wire, copper cable, copper tubing, and copper piping, which are of a value exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) is guilty of grand theft. Grand theft of copper shall be punishable by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, or by imprisonment pursuant to
 subdivision (h) of Section 1170 and a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 317, Sec. 2.   (AB 316)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

487k.

A person who steals, takes, or carries away tractors, all-terrain vehicles, or other agricultural equipment, or any portion thereof, used in the acquisition or production of food for public consumption, which are of a value exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), is guilty of grand theft.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 119, Sec. 1.   (SB 224)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

487m.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 215 and 216 of the Labor Code, the intentional theft of wages in an amount greater than nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) from any one employee, or two thousand three hundred fifty dollars ($2,350) in the aggregate from two or more employees, by an employer in any consecutive 12-month period may be punished as grand theft.

(b) For purposes of this section, “theft of wages” is the intentional deprivation of wages, as defined in Section 200 of the Labor Code, gratuities, as defined in Section 350 of the Labor Code, benefits, or other compensation, by unlawful means, with the knowledge that the wages, gratuities, benefits, or other compensation is due to the employee under the law.

(c) For purposes of this section, “employee” includes an independent contractor and “employer” includes the hiring entity of an independent contractor.

(d) Wages, gratuities, benefits, or other compensation that are the subject of a prosecution under this section may be recovered as restitution in accordance with Sections 1202.4 and 1203.1. This section does not prohibit the employee or the Labor Commissioner from commencing a civil action to seek remedies provided for under the Labor Code for acts prosecuted under this section.

(e) This section does not constitute a change in, and does not expand or limit the scope of conduct prohibited by, Section 487.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.   (AB 1003)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

488.

Theft in other cases is petty theft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1927, Ch. 619.)
-------------------------------------------

489.

Grand theft is punishable as follows:

(a) If the grand theft involves the theft of a firearm, by imprisonment in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years.

(b) If the grand theft involves a violation of Section 487a, by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. The proceeds of this fine shall be allocated to the Bureau of Livestock Identification to be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes relating to the investigation of cases involving grand theft of any animal or animals, or of the carcass or carcasses of, or any portion of the carcass
 or carcasses of, any animal specified in Section 487a.

(c) (1) In all other convictions for grand theft not described in either subdivision (a) or (b), by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(2) In a county participating in a rural crime prevention program pursuant to Title 11.5 (commencing with Section 14170) or Title 11.7 (commencing with Section 14180) of Part 4, the proceeds of a fine imposed pursuant to a conviction for a violation of Section 487k shall be allocated by the Controller, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Central Valley Rural Crime Prevention Program
 and the Central Coast Rural Crime Prevention Program, in accordance with the schedule specified in paragraph (12) of subdivision (c) of Section 13821.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 232, Sec. 1.   (SB 903)   Effective September 28, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

490.

Petty theft is punishable by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1125.)
-------------------------------------------

490a.

Wherever any law or statute of this state refers to or mentions larceny, embezzlement, or stealing, said law or statute shall hereafter be read and interpreted as if the word “theft” were substituted therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1927, Ch. 619.)
-------------------------------------------

490.1.

(a) Petty theft, where the value of the money, labor, real or personal property taken is of a value which does not exceed fifty dollars ($50), may be charged as a misdemeanor or an infraction, at the discretion of the prosecutor, provided that the person charged with the offense has no other theft or theft-related conviction. 

(b) Any offense charged as an infraction under this section shall be subject to the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 17 and Sections 19.6 and 19.7. 

A
 violation which is an infraction under this section is punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

490.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 487 or any other provision of law defining grand theft, obtaining any property by theft where the value of the money, labor, real or personal property taken does not exceed nine hundred fifty dollars
 ($950) shall be considered petty theft and shall be punished as a misdemeanor, except that such person may instead be punished pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 if that person has one or more prior convictions for an offense specified in clause (iv) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 667 or for an offense requiring registration pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 290.

(b) This section shall not be applicable to any theft that may be charged as an infraction pursuant to any other provision of law.

(c) This section shall not apply to theft of a firearm.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 11.1.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 4, 2014, by initiative Prop. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

490.3.

Notwithstanding any other law, in any case involving one or more acts of theft or shoplifting, including, but not limited to, violations of Sections 459.5, 484, 488, and 490.2, the value of property or merchandise stolen may be aggregated into a single count or charge, with the sum of the value of all property or merchandise being the values considered in determining the degree of theft.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 36, Sec. 8.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 36 at the November 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

490.4.

(a) A person who commits any of the following acts is guilty of organized retail theft and shall be punished pursuant to subdivision (b):

(1) Acts in concert with one or more persons to steal merchandise from one or more merchant’s premises or online marketplace with the intent to sell, exchange, or return the merchandise for value.

(2) Acts in concert with two or more persons to receive, purchase, or possess merchandise described in paragraph (1), knowing or believing it to have been stolen.

(3) Acts as an agent of another individual or group of individuals to
 steal merchandise from one or more merchant’s premises or online marketplaces as part of an organized plan to commit theft.

(4) Recruits, coordinates, organizes, supervises, directs, manages, or finances another to undertake any of the acts described in paragraph (1) or (2) or any other statute defining theft of merchandise.

(b) Organized retail theft is punishable as follows:

(1) If violations of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) are committed on two or more separate occasions within a 12-month period, and if the aggregated value of the merchandise stolen, received, purchased, or possessed within that 12-month period exceeds nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), the offense is punishable by imprisonment in a
 county jail not exceeding one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(2) Any other violation of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) that is not described in paragraph (1) of this subdivision is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(3) A violation of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(c) For the purpose of determining whether the defendant acted in concert with another person or persons in any proceeding, the trier of fact may consider any competent evidence, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The defendant has previously acted in concert with another person or persons in committing acts constituting theft, or any related offense, including any conduct that occurred in counties other than the county of the current offense, if relevant to demonstrate a fact other than the defendant’s disposition to commit the act.

(2) That the defendant used or possessed an artifice, instrument, container, device, or other article capable of facilitating the removal of merchandise from a retail establishment without paying the purchase price and use of the artifice, instrument, container, or device or other article is part of an organized plan to commit theft.

(3) The property involved in the offense is of a type or quantity that would not normally be purchased for personal
 use or consumption, and the property is intended for resale.

(d) In a prosecution under this section, the prosecutor shall not be required to charge any other coparticipant of the organized retail theft.

(e) Upon conviction of an offense under this section, the court shall consider ordering, as a condition of probation, that the defendant stay away from retail establishments with a reasonable nexus to the crime committed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 171, Sec. 1.   (SB 982)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

490.5.

(a) Upon a first conviction for petty theft involving merchandise taken from a merchant’s premises or a book or other library materials taken from a library facility, a person shall be punished by a mandatory fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each such violation; and may also be punished by imprisonment in the county jail, not exceeding six months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

(b) When an unemancipated minor’s
 willful conduct would constitute petty theft involving merchandise taken from a merchant’s premises or a book or other library materials taken from a library facility, any merchant or library facility who has been injured by that conduct may bring a civil action against the parent or legal guardian having control and custody of the minor. For the purposes of those actions the misconduct of the unemancipated minor shall be imputed to the parent or legal guardian having control and custody of the minor. The parent or legal guardian having control or custody of an unemancipated minor whose conduct violates this subdivision shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor to a merchant or to a library facility for damages of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), plus costs. In addition to the foregoing damages, the parent or legal guardian shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor to the merchant for the retail value of the merchandise if it is not recovered
 in a merchantable condition, or to a library facility for the fair market value of its book or other library materials. Recovery of these damages may be had in addition to, and is not limited by, any other provision of law which limits the liability of a parent or legal guardian for the tortious conduct of a minor. An action for recovery of damages, pursuant to this subdivision, may be brought in small claims court if the total damages do not exceed the jurisdictional limit of that court, or in any other appropriate court; however, total damages, including the value of the merchandise or book or other library materials, shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each action brought under this section.

The provisions of this subdivision are in addition to other civil remedies and do not limit merchants or other persons to elect to pursue other civil remedies, except that the provisions of Section 1714.1 of the Civil Code shall not apply herein.

(c) When an adult or emancipated minor has unlawfully taken merchandise from a merchant’s premises, or a book or other library materials from a library facility, the adult or emancipated minor shall be liable to the merchant or library facility for damages of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), plus costs. In addition to the foregoing damages, the adult or emancipated minor shall be liable to the merchant for the retail value of the merchandise if it is not recovered in merchantable condition, or to a library facility for the fair market value of its book or other library materials. An action for recovery of damages, pursuant to this subdivision, may be brought in small claims court if the total damages do not exceed the jurisdictional limit of such court, or in any other appropriate court. The provisions of this subdivision are in addition to other civil remedies and do not limit merchants or other persons
 to elect to pursue other civil remedies.

(d) In lieu of the fines prescribed by subdivision (a), any person may be required to perform public services designated by the court, provided that in no event shall any such person be required to perform less than the number of hours of such public service necessary to satisfy the fine assessed by the court as provided by subdivision (a) at the minimum wage prevailing in the state at the time of sentencing.

(e) All fines collected under this section shall be collected and distributed in accordance with Sections 1463 and 1463.1 of the Penal Code; provided, however, that a county may, by a majority vote of the members of its board of supervisors, allocate any amount up to, but not exceeding 50 percent of such fines to the county superintendent of schools for allocation to local school districts. The fines allocated shall be administered by
 the county superintendent of schools to finance public school programs, which provide counseling or other educational services designed to discourage shoplifting, theft, and burglary. Subject to rules and regulations as may be adopted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, each county superintendent of schools shall allocate such funds to school districts within the county which submit project applications designed to further the educational purposes of this section. The costs of administration of this section by each county superintendent of schools shall be paid from the funds allocated to the county superintendent of schools.

(f) (1) A merchant may detain a person for a reasonable time for the purpose of conducting an investigation in a reasonable manner whenever the merchant has probable cause to believe the person to be detained is attempting to unlawfully take or has unlawfully taken merchandise from the
 merchant’s premises.

A theater owner may detain a person for a reasonable time for the purpose of conducting an investigation in a reasonable manner whenever the theater owner has probable cause to believe the person to be detained is attempting to operate a video recording device within the premises of a motion picture theater without the authority of the owner of the theater.

A person employed by a library facility may detain a person for a reasonable time for the purpose of conducting an investigation in a reasonable manner whenever the person employed by a library facility has probable cause to believe the person to be detained is attempting to unlawfully remove or has unlawfully removed books or library materials from the premises of the library facility.

(2) In making the detention a merchant, theater owner, or a person employed by a library facility may
 use a reasonable amount of nondeadly force necessary to protect himself or herself and to prevent escape of the person detained or the loss of tangible or intangible property.

(3) During the period of detention any items which a merchant or theater owner, or any items which a person employed by a library facility has probable cause to believe are unlawfully taken from the premises of the merchant or library facility, or recorded on theater premises, and which are in plain view may be examined by the merchant, theater owner, or person employed by a library facility for the purposes of ascertaining the ownership thereof.

(4) A merchant, theater owner, a person employed by a library facility, or an agent thereof, having probable cause to believe the person detained was attempting to unlawfully take or has taken any item from the premises, or was attempting to operate a video
 recording device within the premises of a motion picture theater without the authority of the owner of the theater, may request the person detained to voluntarily surrender the item or recording. Should the person detained refuse to surrender the recording or item of which there is probable cause to believe has been recorded on or unlawfully taken from the premises, or attempted to be recorded or unlawfully taken from the premises, a limited and reasonable search may be conducted by those authorized to make the detention in order to recover the item. Only packages, shopping bags, handbags or other property in the immediate possession of the person detained, but not including any clothing worn by the person, may be searched pursuant to this subdivision. Upon surrender or discovery of the item, the person detained may also be requested, but may not be required, to provide adequate proof of his or her true identity.

(5) If any person admitted to a
 theater in which a motion picture is to be or is being exhibited, refuses or fails to give or surrender possession or to cease operation of any video recording device that the person has brought into or attempts to bring into that theater, then a theater owner shall have the right to refuse admission to that person or request that the person leave the premises and shall thereupon offer to refund and, unless that offer is refused, refund to that person the price paid by that person for admission to that theater. If the person thereafter refuses to leave the theater or cease operation of the video recording device, then the person shall be deemed to be intentionally interfering with and obstructing those attempting to carry on a lawful business within the meaning of Section 602.1.

(6) A peace officer who accepts custody of a person arrested for an offense contained in this section may, subsequent to the arrest, search the person arrested and his
 or her immediate possessions for any item or items alleged to have been taken.

(7) In any civil action brought by any person resulting from a detention or arrest by a merchant, it shall be a defense to such action that the merchant detaining or arresting such person had probable cause to believe that the person had stolen or attempted to steal merchandise and that the merchant acted reasonably under all the circumstances.

In any civil action brought by any person resulting from a detention or arrest by a theater owner or person employed by a library facility, it shall be a defense to that action that the theater owner or person employed by a library facility detaining or arresting that person had probable cause to believe that the person was attempting to operate a video recording device within the premises of a motion picture theater without the authority of the owner of the theater or had stolen or
 attempted to steal books or library materials and that the person employed by a library facility acted reasonably under all the circumstances.

(g) As used in this section:

(1) “Merchandise” means any personal property, capable of manual delivery, displayed, held or offered for retail sale by a merchant.

(2) “Merchant” means an owner or operator, and the agent, consignee, employee, lessee, or officer of an owner or operator, of any premises used for the retail purchase or sale of any personal property capable of manual delivery.

(3) “Theater owner” means an owner or operator, and the agent, employee, consignee, lessee, or officer of an owner or operator, of any premises used for the exhibition or performance of motion pictures to the general public.

(4) The terms “book or other library materials” include any book, plate, picture, photograph, engraving, painting, drawing, map, newspaper, magazine, pamphlet, broadside, manuscript, document, letter, public record, microform, sound recording, audiovisual material in any format, magnetic or other tape, electronic data-processing record, artifact, or other documentary, written or printed material regardless of physical form or characteristics, or any part thereof, belonging to, on loan to, or otherwise in the custody of a library facility.

(5) The term “library facility” includes any public library; any library of an educational, historical or eleemosynary institution, organization or society; any museum; any repository of public records.

(h) Any library facility shall post at its entrance and exit a conspicuous sign to
 read as follows:

“IN ORDER TO PREVENT THE THEFT OF BOOKS AND LIBRARY MATERIALS, STATE LAW AUTHORIZES THE DETENTION FOR A REASONABLE PERIOD OF ANY PERSON USING THESE FACILITIES SUSPECTED OF COMMITTING “LIBRARY THEFT” (PENAL CODE SECTION 490.5).”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 34, Sec. 1.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

490.6.

(a) A person employed by an amusement park may detain a person for a reasonable time for the purpose of conducting an investigation in a reasonable manner whenever the person employed by the amusement park has probable cause to believe the person to be detained is violating lawful amusement park rules.

(b) If any person admitted to an amusement park refuses or fails to follow lawful amusement park rules, after being so informed, then an amusement park employee may request that the
 person either comply or leave the premises. If the person refuses to leave the premises or comply with lawful park rules, then the person shall be deemed to be intentionally interfering with and obstructing those attempting to carry on a lawful business within the meaning of Section 602.1.

(c) In any civil action brought by any person resulting from a detention or an arrest by a person employed by an amusement park, it shall be a defense to that action that the amusement park employee detaining or arresting the person had probable cause to believe that the person was not following lawful amusement park rules and that the amusement park employee acted reasonably under all the circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 731, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

490.7.

(a) The Legislature finds that free newspapers provide a key source of information to the public, in many cases providing an important alternative to the news and ideas expressed in other local media sources. The Legislature further finds that the unauthorized taking of multiple copies of free newspapers, whether done to sell them to recycling centers, to injure a business competitor, to deprive others of the opportunity to read them, or for any other reason, injures the rights of readers, writers, publishers, and advertisers, and impoverishes
 the marketplace of ideas in California.

(b) No person shall take more than twenty-five (25) copies of the current issue of a free or complimentary newspaper if done with the intent to do one or more of the following:

(1) Recycle the newspapers for cash or other payment.

(2) Sell or barter the newspaper.

(3) Deprive others of the opportunity to read or enjoy the newspaper.

(4) Harm a business competitor.

(c) This section does not apply to the owner or operator of the newsrack in which the copies are placed, the owner or operator of the property on which the newsrack is placed, the publisher, the printer, the distributor, the
 deliverer of the newspaper, or to any advertiser in that issue, or to any other person who has the express permission to do so from any of these entities.

(d) Any newspaper publisher may provide express permission to take more than twenty-five (25) copies of the current issue of a free or complimentary newspaper by indicating on the newsrack or in the newspaper itself, that people may take a greater number of copies if they wish.

(e) A first violation of subdivision (b) shall be an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250). A second or subsequent violation shall be punishable as an infraction or a misdemeanor. A misdemeanor conviction under this section is punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), imprisonment of up to 10 days in a county jail, or by both that fine and imprisonment. The court may order community service in
 lieu of the punishment otherwise provided for an infraction or misdemeanor in the amount of 20 hours for an infraction, and 40 hours for a misdemeanor. A misdemeanor conviction under this section shall not constitute a conviction for petty theft.

(f) This section shall not be construed to repeal, modify, or weaken any existing legal prohibitions against the taking of private property.

(g) For purposes of this section, an issue is current if no more than half of the period of time until the distribution of the next issue has passed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 228, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

490.8.

(a) A court sentencing a defendant for any violation described in subdivision (b) shall consider issuing an order restraining the defendant from entering the premises of the retail establishment, that may be valid for up to two years, as determined by the court.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to a person convicted of any of the following offenses:

(1) Shoplifting in violation of Section 459.5.

(2) Any theft, including a violation of Section 487 or 488, from a retail establishment.

(3) Organized retail theft in violation of Section 490.4.

(4) Any vandalism of a retail establishment in violation of Section 594.

(5) Any assault or battery of an employee of a retail establishment while that person is working at the retail establishment, including a violation of Section 240, 242, or 245.

(c) (1) An order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall prohibit the restrained person from entering the retail establishment, or being present on the grounds of, or any parking lot adjacent to and used to service, the retail establishment.

(2) If the retail establishment is part of a chain or franchise, the court may include
 other retail establishments in that chain or franchise within a specified geographic range in the order.

(d) In determining whether to impose a retail crime restraining
 order pursuant to subdivision (a) or (e), the court shall consider whether the retail establishment is the only place that sells food, pharmaceuticals, or other basic life necessities within one mile of where the individual resides, or otherwise creates undue hardship for the individual.

(e) (1) A prosecuting attorney, city attorney, county counsel, or attorney representing a retail establishment may file a petition requesting a retail crime restraining order for an individual who has been arrested, including, but not limited to, the issuance of a citation in lieu of a custodial arrest pursuant to Section 853.6, two or more times for any of the offenses listed in subdivision (b) within the same retail establishment.

(2) An order issued
 pursuant to this subdivision shall be issued after a hearing.

(3) The respondent shall be personally served with notice of the hearing and shall be entitled to representation by court-appointed counsel.

(4) The petitioner shall bear the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the respondent, on two or more separate occasions, committed an offense described in subdivision (b) within the retail establishment or on the grounds thereof.

(5) The court may issue an order restraining the respondent from entering the premises of the retail establishment for a period not to exceed two years if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that both of the following are true:

(A) The respondent, on two or more separate occasions, committed an offense described in subdivision (b) within the retail establishment or on the grounds thereof.

(B) There is a substantial likelihood that the individual will return to the retail establishment.

(6) (A) An order issued pursuant to this subdivision shall prohibit the restrained person from entering the retail establishment, or being present on the grounds of, or any parking lot adjacent to and used to service, the retail establishment.

(B) If the retail establishment is part of a chain or franchise, the court may include other retail establishments in that chain or franchise
 within a specified geographic range in the order.

(f) A violation of an order issued pursuant to this section is punishable as a misdemeanor. Declarative of existing law, prosecution under this section shall not preclude prosecution for any other offenses committed during a violation of this section.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 853.6, an officer arresting a person for a violation of this section is not required to release the person pursuant to a written notice to appear.

(h) Declarative of existing law, a court may offer an individual charged with a violation of this section an opportunity to participate in a diversion program for which they are eligible, including those described in Title 6 (commencing with Section 976) of Part
 2.

(i) If a person subject to a retail crime restraining order issued pursuant to this section was not present in court at the time the order was issued or renewed, the retail crime restraining order shall be personally served on the restrained person by a law enforcement officer, or by a person as provided in Section 414.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(j) The Judicial Council may prescribe the form of the petitions and orders and any other documents, and may promulgate any rules of court, necessary to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 169, Sec. 2.   (AB 3209)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

491.

(a) Companion animals are personal property, and their value is to be ascertained in the same manner as the value of other property.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “companion animal” means an animal, including, but not limited to, a dog or a cat that a person keeps and provides care for as a household pet or
 otherwise for the purpose of companionship, emotional support, service, or protection.

(2) For purposes of this section, “companion animal” excludes feral animals, including, but not limited to, feral cats as defined in Section 31752.5 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 546, Sec. 3.   (AB 1290)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

492.

If the thing stolen consists of any evidence of debt, or other written instrument, the amount of money due thereupon, or secured to be paid thereby, and remaining unsatisfied, or which in any contingency might be collected thereon, or the value of the property the title to which is shown thereby, or the sum which might be recovered in the absence thereof, is the value of the thing stolen.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

493.

If the thing stolen is any ticket or other paper or writing entitling or purporting to entitle the holder or proprietor thereof to a passage upon any railroad or vessel or other public conveyance, the price at which tickets entitling a person to a like passage are usually sold by the proprietors of such conveyance is the value of such ticket, paper, or writing.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

494.

All the provisions of this Chapter apply where the property taken is an instrument for the payment of money, evidence of debt, public security, or passage ticket, completed and ready to be issued or delivered, although the same has never been issued or delivered by the makers thereof to any person as a purchaser or owner.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

495.

The provisions of this Chapter apply where the thing taken is any fixture or part of the realty, and is severed at the time of the taking, in the same manner as if the thing had been severed by another person at some previous time.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

496.

(a) Every person who buys or receives any property that has been stolen or that has been obtained in any manner constituting theft or extortion, knowing the property to be so stolen or obtained, or who conceals, sells, withholds, or aids in concealing, selling, or withholding any property from the owner, knowing the property to be so stolen or obtained, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or
 imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170. However, if the value of the property does not exceed nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), the offense shall be a misdemeanor, punishable only by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, if such person has no prior convictions for an offense specified in clause (iv) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 667 or for an offense requiring registration pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 290.

A principal in the actual theft of the property may be convicted pursuant to this section. However, no person may be convicted both pursuant to this section and of the theft of the same property.

(b) Every swap meet vendor, as defined in Section 21661 of the Business and Professions Code, and every person whose principal business is dealing in, or collecting, merchandise or personal property, and every agent, employee,
 or representative of that person, who buys or receives any property of a value in excess of nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) that has been stolen or obtained in any manner constituting theft or extortion, under circumstances that should cause the person, agent, employee, or representative to make reasonable inquiry to ascertain that the person from whom the property was bought or received had the legal right to sell or deliver it, without making a reasonable inquiry, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

Every swap meet vendor, as defined in Section 21661 of the Business and Professions Code, and every person whose principal business is dealing in, or collecting, merchandise or personal property, and every agent, employee, or representative of that person, who buys or receives any property of a value of nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or less that has been stolen
 or obtained in any manner constituting theft or extortion, under circumstances that should cause the person, agent, employee, or representative to make reasonable inquiry to ascertain that the person from whom the property was bought or received had the legal right to sell or deliver it, without making a reasonable inquiry, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Any person who has been injured by a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) may bring an action for three times the amount of actual damages, if any, sustained by the plaintiff, costs of suit, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 664, any attempt to commit any act prohibited by this section, except an offense specified in the accusatory pleading as a misdemeanor, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section
 1170.

(History: Amended November 4, 2014, by initiative Proposition 47, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

496.5.

(a) A person who unlawfully possesses property that was acquired through one or more acts of theft from a vehicle, unlawful entry of a vehicle, burglary of a locked vehicle, or vehicle tampering as defined in Section 10852 of the Vehicle Code, whether or not the person committed the act of theft, burglary, or vehicle tampering, is guilty of automotive property theft for resale when both of the following apply:
